Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4018.
people of the state of michigan enact: CHAPTER XIIA Sec. 16. (1) If Except as provided in subsection (7), if a juvenile who is less than 18 years of age is taken into custody or detained, the juvenile must not be confined in a police station, prison, jail, lock-up, or reformatory or transported with, or compelled or permitted to associate or mingle with, criminal or dissolute persons. Except as otherwise provided in section 15 of this chapter, the court may order a juvenile 15 years of age or older whose habits or conduct are considered a menace to other juveniles, or who may not otherwise be safely detained, placed in a jail or other place of detention for adults, but in a room or ward separate from adults and for not more than 30 days, unless longer detention is necessary for the service of process. (2) The county board of commissioners in each county or of counties contracting together may provide for the diagnosis, treatment, care, training, and detention of juveniles in a child care home or facility conducted as an agency of the county if the home or facility meets the licensing standards established under 1973 PA 116, MCL 722.111 to 722.128. The court or a court-approved agency may arrange for the boarding of juveniles in any of the following: (a) If a juvenile is within the court's jurisdiction under section 2(a) of this chapter, a suitable foster care home subject to the court's supervision. If a juvenile is within the court's jurisdiction under section 2(b) of this chapter, the court shall not place a juvenile in a foster care home subject to the court's supervision. (b) A child caring institution or child placing agency licensed by the department to receive for care juveniles within the court's jurisdiction. (c) If in a room or ward separate and apart from adult criminals, the county jail for juveniles over more than 17 years of age within the court's jurisdiction. (3) If a detention home or facility is established as an agency of the county, the judge may appoint a superintendent and other necessary employees for the home or facility who shall receive compensation as provided by the county board of commissioners of the county. This section does not alter or diminish the legal responsibility of the department or a county juvenile agency to receive juveniles committed by the court. (4) If the court under subsection (2) arranges for the board of juveniles temporarily detained in private homes or in a child caring institution or child placing agency, a reasonable sum fixed by the court for the juvenile's board must be paid by the county treasurer as provided in section 25 of this chapter. (5) A court shall not provide foster care home services subject to the court's supervision to juveniles within section 2(b) of this chapter. (6) A juvenile detention home described in subsection (3) is operated under the direction of the county board of commissioners or, in a county that has an elected county executive, under the county executive's direction. A different method for directing the operation of a detention home may be agreed to in any county by the chief judge of the circuit court in that county and the county board of commissioners or, in a county that has an elected county executive, the county executive. (7) If a juvenile who is less than 18 years of age is taken into custody or detained, the juvenile may be transported with an adult if all of the following apply: (a) The juvenile is 16 years of age or older. (b) The adult is not more than 25 years of age. (c) The juvenile and adult are taken into custody at the same time. (d) The juvenile and adult are taken into custody for the same offense or both occupied the same vehicle at the time the offense was committed. (e) The juvenile is taken directly to the appropriate location and is then separated from the adult at the earliest available time in accordance with subsection (1). Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 90 days after the date it is enacted into law.